Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1104.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 22, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 22-213, to read: START_STATUTE22-213. Actions against veterinarians; evidence; expert witness affidavit; definition A. The following apply to a civil action against a veterinarian for the death of or an injury to an animal in the veterinarian's care: 1. On request of either party, the following information shall be admitted into evidence: (a) Any records and reports that are made by the Arizona state veterinary medical examining board or an investigator for the Arizona state veterinary medical examining board during an investigation of the animal's death or injury. (b) Any findings or orders that are adopted by the Arizona state veterinary medical examining board following an investigation and hearing on the animal's death or injury. 2. Any of the items listed in paragraph 1 of this subsection may be used in lieu of an expert witness affidavit in the civil action. 3. Any damages that are awarded against the veterinarian may include all reasonable medical expenses that the plaintiff paid to treat the animal's injuries that resulted from the veterinarian's treatment of the animal, including expenses that were paid to a different veterinarian. b. For the purposes of this section, "veterinarian" includes a licensed veterinarian as defined in section 32-2201, a certified veterinary technician as defined in section 32-2201 and a licensed veterinary faculty member as defined in section 32-2201. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 22, chapter 5, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 22-526, to read: START_STATUTE22-526. Actions against veterinarians; evidence; expert witness affidavit; damages; justice court transfer; definition A. The following apply to a small claims action against a veterinarian for the death of or an injury to an animal in the veterinarian's care: 1. On request of either party, the following information shall be admitted into evidence: (a) Any records and reports that are made by the Arizona state veterinary medical examining board or an investigator for the board during an investigation of the animal's death or injury. (b) Any findings or orders that are adopted by the Arizona state veterinary medical examining board following an investigation and hearing on the animal's death or injury. 2. Any of the items listed in paragraph 1 of this subsection may be used in lieu of an expert witness affidavit in the civil action. 3. Any damages that are awarded against the veterinarian may include all reasonable medical expenses that the plaintiff paid to treat the animal's injuries that resulted from the veterinarian's treatment of the animal, including EXPENSES that were paid to a different veterinarian. B. If the veterinarian requests that the small claims action be transferred to the justice court, the evidence listed in subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section shall be transferred and be admitted into evidence in any hearing or trial that is held in the justice court. C. For the purposes of this section, "veterinarian" includes a licensed veterinarian as defined in section 32-2201, a certified veterinary technician as defined in section 32-2201 and a licensed veterinary faculty member as defined in section 32-2201. END_STATUTE